dictsource/phn_rules
//vowels
.L01 a i u e o ao ai ua uo
//codas
.L02 n m l s ng
//tones
.L03 1 2 3 4 55 11 52 14

.group a
    a (L03  a:
    a  a
    ao aO
    ao (L02 o'
    ai aI
    ai (L02 e'

.group b
    b  b

.group c
    c  ts

.group d
    d  d

.group e
    e (L03 E:
    e E

.group f
    f  f

.group g
    g  g

.group h
    h  h
    h (i x
    h (u x

.group i
    i (L03 i:
    i i

.group j
    j  z'

.group k
    k  k

.group l
    l  l
    l (L03  l2
    ll (L03 l // succeeded by onset l

.group m
    m  m

.group n
    n  n
    ng N

.group o
    o (L03 o:
    o o

.group p
    p  p

.group q
    q  tS

.group s
    s	s

.group t
    t  t

.group u
    u (L03 @:
    u @
    ua @A
    uo @O

.group v
    v  v

.group w
    w  w

.group x
    x  s'

.group y
    y  j

.group z
    z  z

.group
    1	44
    2	11
    3	51
    4	14
